Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5584XS (3) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2344 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.196 Parkinsonâs disease 1 prevention, research, and care fund ââ state plan. 2 1. Fund ââ grants. 3 a. A Parkinsonâs disease prevention, research, and care 4 fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the 5 department. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated 6 to or deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33, 7 moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated 8 at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall 9 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. 10 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 11 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 12 b. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department to 13 be used for any of the following purposes: 14 (1) To award grants to public or private entities, including 15 but not limited to institutions of higher education governed by 16 the state board of regents, for any of the following purposes: 17 (a) To create and expedite innovation in research on 18 Parkinsonâs disease and related disorders to improve the health 19 of residents of this state, enhance the potential for a medical 20 or scientific breakthrough in research on Parkinsonâs disease 21 and related disorders, and enhance the quality and quantity 22 of research in this state regarding Parkinsonâs disease and 23 related disorders. 24 (b) To attract, create, or expand research capabilities 25 to promote a substantial increase in research on Parkinsonâs 26 disease and related disorders, strategies for prevention of 27 Parkinsonâs disease and related disorders, and the creation of 28 associated jobs in this state. 29 (c) To support caregivers of individuals living with 30 Parkinsonâs disease, including respite care, training, and 31 mental health resources. 32 (2) To develop, implement, and revise the state plan under 33 subsection 5 to foster synergistic collaboration between 34 institutions of higher education governed by the state board 35 -1- LSB 5584XS (3) 91 ak/ko 1/ 6 S.F. 2344 of regents and their partners and other grant recipients in 1 research on Parkinsonâs disease and related disorders. 2 2. Advisory council. The department shall establish 3 a neurodegenerative disease advisory council within the 4 department to advise the department on establishing guidelines 5 for grant applications, grant award selection criteria, 6 and reporting requirements by grant recipients under this 7 section, and to establish and revise the state plan under 8 subsection 5. The council must include members from leading 9 research institutions in this state, members from organizations 10 advocating for individuals with Parkinsonâs disease, members 11 from caregiver support groups, and members from the medical 12 community who specialize in the diagnosis and treatment of 13 neurological diseases. Notwithstanding section 4A.5, the 14 council shall not dissolve. 15 3. Reports by recipients. A recipient of a grant under 16 this section shall annually submit a report to the department 17 in a manner determined by the department. The report must 18 include information detailing, as applicable, the progress of 19 funded research, outcomes and measurable impacts of caregiver 20 support programs, recommendations for improving grants awarded 21 under this section, and any other information required by the 22 department. 23 4. Report by department. On or before January 31 of each 24 year, the department shall submit a report to the governor and 25 the general assembly. The department shall also publish the 26 report on the departmentâs internet site. The report must 27 provide, for the previous fiscal year, a list of recipients 28 of grants, the amounts of the grants, the accomplishments 29 and achievements of grant recipients, the fundâs financial 30 statements, an assessment of the effectiveness of the 31 departmentâs strategies and plans in awarding grants, an 32 estimate of the cost to this state of caring for individuals 33 with Parkinsonâs disease and related disorders, a statement 34 of the effectiveness of the departmentâs recordkeeping 35 -2- LSB 5584XS (3) 91 ak/ko 2/ 6 S.F. 2344 standards and oversight methods for the use of grants, and any 1 recommendations for proposed legislation. 2 5. State plan. The department shall develop and 3 periodically revise a state plan to address neurodegenerative 4 diseases, with Parkinsonâs disease as the initial and primary 5 focus. The plan shall address related neurodegenerative 6 diseases only to the extent that a related neurodegenerative 7 disease informs Parkinsonâs disease, prevention, diagnosis, 8 care, and research. The department shall publish the plan on 9 the departmentâs internet site. The plan must include but is 10 not limited to estimates of the prevalence, incidence, and 11 demographic distribution for Parkinsonâs disease and related 12 disorders; the identification of data gaps; short-term and 13 long-term goals and measurable objectives for prevention, 14 diagnosis, care, research, surveillance, workforce, and support 15 services; a strategy for improving early diagnosis and timely 16 access to specialists; care coordination and caregiver support 17 strategies; a workforce development plan including training 18 for neurologists, primary care clinicians, allied health 19 professionals, and long-term care staff; a public awareness 20 and education plan emphasizing equity and culturally competent 21 outreach; a data and registry integration strategy, including 22 mechanisms for secure data sharing and research access; a 23 research and innovation agenda with prioritized areas for 24 translational and clinical research; recommendations for 25 sustainable financing, including public and private funding 26 streams and potential creation of dedicated research or program 27 funds; evaluation metrics; and a strategy and schedule for 28 revising the plan at least every five years. 29 6. Cooperation. For purposes of this section, the 30 department may collaborate and coordinate with private sector 31 entities and with federal, state, and local government entities 32 to enhance the effectiveness of grants awarded under this 33 section, leverage available resources effectively, and avoid 34 duplication. The department may enter into agreements with 35 -3- LSB 5584XS (3) 91 ak/ko 3/ 6 S.F. 2344 such entities to facilitate data sharing and collaborative 1 research, provided the data does not contain confidential 2 information. This subsection does not apply to federal, state, 3 and local law enforcement agencies. 4 7. Rules. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to 5 chapter 17A to implement and administer this section. 6 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the 7 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 8 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 9 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 For deposit in the Parkinsonâs disease prevention, research, 12 and care fund created in section 135.196, as enacted by this 13 Act: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 15 1. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,000,000 16 shall be allocated to award grants to institutions of higher 17 education governed by the state board of regents, or public 18 or private research institutions or medical centers actively 19 engaged in Parkinsonâs disease research, with priority given 20 to applications aimed at developing a cure for Parkinsonâs 21 disease. 22 2. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,000,000 23 shall be allocated to award grants to support caregivers of 24 individuals living with Parkinsonâs disease, including respite 25 care, training, and mental health resources. 26 3. Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,000,000 27 shall be allocated to establish the state plan to address 28 neurodegenerative diseases required under section 135.196, 29 subsection 5, as enacted by this Act. 30 Sec. 3. INITIAL STATE PLAN. The department shall publish on 31 the departmentâs internet site the initial state plan required 32 under section 135.196, subsection 5, as enacted by this Act, on 33 or before October 1, 2027. The department shall make a draft 34 plan available for public comment at least thirty calendar days 35 -4- LSB 5584XS (3) 91 ak/ko 4/ 6 S.F. 2344 before publication. 1 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect October 1, 2 2026. 3